Nebraska, session 109, LB329.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB329 LB329
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 28-316.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
28-316.01 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Sexual contact has the same meaning as in section 28-318;
(b) Sexual penetration has the same meaning as in section 28-318;
(c) School contract worker means a person nineteen years of age or
older who, as part of such person's employment, spends time working at a
public, private, denominational, or parochial school approved or
accredited by the State Department of Education but is not employed by
such a school, including, but not limited to, a school resource officer,
a construction worker, or a school consultant or independent contractor;
(d) (c) School employee means (i) a person nineteen years of age or
older who is employed by a public, private, denominational, or parochial
school approved or accredited by the State Department of Education or
(ii) a school contract worker; and
(e) (d) Student means a person at least sixteen but not more than
nineteen years of age enrolled in or attending a public, private,
denominational, or parochial school approved or accredited by the State
Department of Education, or who was such a person enrolled in or who
attended such a school within ninety days of any violation of this
section.
(2) A person commits the offense of sexual abuse by a school
employee if a school employee subjects a student in the school to which
such employee is assigned for work to sexual penetration or sexual
contact, or engages in a pattern or scheme of conduct to subject a
student in the school to which such employee is assigned for work to
sexual penetration or sexual contact. It is not a defense to a charge
under this section that the student consented to such sexual penetration
or sexual contact.
(3) Any school employee who engages in sexual penetration with a
student is guilty of sexual abuse by a school employee in the first
-2-

LB329 LB329
2025 2025
degree. Sexual abuse by a school employee in the first degree is a Class
IIA felony.
(4) Any school employee who engages in sexual contact with a student
is guilty of sexual abuse by a school employee in the second degree.
Sexual abuse by a school employee in the second degree is a Class IIIA
felony.
(5) Any school employee who engages in a pattern or scheme of
conduct with the intent to subject a student to sexual penetration or
sexual contact is guilty of sexual abuse by a school employee in the
third degree. Sexual abuse by a school employee in the third degree is a
Class IV felony.
Sec. 2. Original section 28-316.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-3-